Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1

Adult Protection

71-6-101. Short title — Legislative intent.

This part may be cited as the “Tennessee Adult Protection Act.”

The purpose of this part is to protect adults coming within this part from abuse, neglect or exploitation by requiring reporting of suspected cases by any person having cause to believe that such cases exist. It is intended that, as a result of such reports, the protective services of the state shall prevent further abuse, neglect or exploitation within the limitations set out in this part.

It is recognized that adequate protection of adults will require the cooperation of many agencies and service providers in conjunction with the department of human services due to the often complex nature of the risks to this adult group, and that services to meet the needs of this group will not always be available in each community. However, it is desirable that the following services, as well as other services needed to meet the intent of this part, be available: medical care, mental health and developmental disabilities services, including in-home assessments and evaluations; in-home services including homemaker, home-health, chore, meals; emergency services including shelter; financial assistance; legal services; transportation; counseling; foster care; day care; respite care; and other services as needed to carry out the intent of this part.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2601; Acts 1986, ch. 630, § 1; T.C.A., §14-25-101.

Cross-References. Family violence shelter and child abuse prevention services, title 71, ch. 6, part 2.

Power of attorney for health care, right to die naturally, title 34, ch. 6, part 2.

Rule Reference. This part is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Health, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Respecting Our Elders: Can Tennessee Do More to Protect its Elder Population from Institutional Abuse and Neglect?, 66 Tenn. L. Rev. 819 (1999).

The Incompetent's Right to Refuse Life-Sustaining Treatment (Mary E. McCroskey), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 145 (1983).

71-6-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abuse or neglect” means the infliction of physical pain, injury, or mental anguish, or the deprivation of services by a caretaker that are necessary to maintain the health and welfare of an adult or a situation in which an adult is unable to provide or obtain the services that are necessary to maintain that person's health or welfare. Nothing in this part shall be construed to mean a person is abused or neglected or in need of protective services for the sole reason that the person relies on or is being furnished treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing in lieu of medical treatment; further, nothing in this part shall be construed to require or authorize the provision of medical care to any terminally ill person if such person has executed an unrevoked living will in accordance with the Tennessee Right to Natural Death Act, compiled in title 32, chapter 11, and if the provision of such medical care would conflict with the terms of such living will;

“Abuse or neglect” means transporting an adult and knowingly abandoning, leaving or failing to provide additional planned transportation for the adult if the adult's caretaker knows, or should know, that:

The adult is unable to protect or care for himself or herself without assistance or supervision; and

The caretaker's conduct causes any of the results listed in subdivision (1)(A) or creates a substantial risk of such results;

“Adult” means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older who because of mental or physical dysfunctioning or advanced age is unable to manage such person's own resources, carry out the activities of daily living, or protect such person from neglect, hazardous or abusive situations without assistance from others and who has no available, willing, and responsibly able person for assistance and who may be in need of protective services; provided, however, that a person eighteen (18) years of age or older who is mentally impaired but still competent shall be deemed to be a person with mental dysfunction for the purposes of this chapter;

“Advanced age” means sixty (60) years of age or older;

“Capacity to consent” means the mental ability to make a rational decision, which includes the ability to perceive, appreciate all relevant facts and to reach a rational judgment upon such facts. A decision itself to refuse services cannot be the sole evidence for finding the person lacks capacity to consent;

“Caretaker”:

Means an individual or institution who has assumed the duty to provide for the care of the adult by contract or agreement;

Includes a parent, spouse, adult child or other relative, both biological or by marriage, who:

Resides with or in the same building with or regularly visits the adult;

Knows or reasonably should know of the adult's mental or physical dysfunction or advanced age; and

Knows or reasonably should know that the adult is unable to adequately provide for the adult's own care; and

Does not mean a financial institution as a caretaker of funds or other assets unless such financial institution has entered into an agreement to act as a trustee of such property or has been appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction to act as a trustee with regard to the property of the adult;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of human services;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Exploitation” means the improper use by a caretaker of funds that have been paid by a governmental agency to an adult or to the caretaker for the use or care of the adult;

“Imminent danger” means conditions calculated to and capable of producing within a relatively short period of time a reasonable probability of resultant irreparable physical or mental harm or the cessation of life, or both, if such conditions are not removed or alleviated;

“Investigation” includes, but is not limited to, a personal interview with the individual reported to be abused, neglected, or exploited. When abuse or neglect is allegedly the cause of death, a coroner's or doctor's report shall be examined as part of the investigation;

“Protective services” means services undertaken by the department with or on behalf of an adult in need of protective services who is being abused, neglected, or exploited. These services may include, but are not limited to, conducting investigations of complaints of possible abuse, neglect, or exploitation to ascertain whether or not the situation and condition of the adult in need of protective services warrants further action; social services aimed at preventing and remedying abuse, neglect, and exploitation; services directed toward seeking legal determination of whether the adult in need of protective services has been abused, neglected or exploited and procurement of suitable care in or out of the adult's home;

“Relative” means spouse; child, including stepchild, adopted child or foster child; parents, including stepparents, adoptive parents or foster parents; siblings of the whole or half-blood; step-siblings; grandparents; grandchildren, of any degree; and aunts, uncles, nieces and nephews; and

“Sexual abuse” occurs when an adult, as defined in this chapter, is forced, tricked, threatened or otherwise coerced by a person into sexual activity, involuntary exposure to sexually explicit material or language, or sexual contact against such adult's will. Sexual abuse also occurs when an adult, as defined in this chapter, is unable to give consent to such sexual activities or contact and is engaged in such activities or contact with another person.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2602; Acts 1980, ch. 513, § 2; 1986, ch. 630, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., §14-25-102; Acts 1995, ch. 486, §§ 1, 2, 9, 17; 1996, ch. 1029, § 1; 2004, ch. 780, § 4; 2009, ch. 337, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 898, § 1; 2013, ch. 431, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 1044, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 431, § 3 provided that the act, which amended the definitions of “abuse or neglect” and “caretaker”, shall be known and may be cited as “Lynn's Law.”

Law Reviews.

Special Project, Family Law in the 1990s — New Problems, Strong Solutions, 46 Vand. L. Rev. 677 (1993).

71-6-103. Rules and regulations — Reports of abuse or neglect — Investigation — Providing protective services — Consent of adult — Duties of other agencies.

The commissioner has the discretion to adopt such rules, regulations, procedures, guidelines, or any other expressions of policy necessary to effect the purpose of this part insofar as such action is reasonably calculated to serve the public interest.

Any person, including, but not limited to, a physician, nurse, social worker, department personnel, coroner, medical examiner, alternate care facility employee, or caretaker, having reasonable cause to suspect that an adult has suffered abuse, neglect, or exploitation, shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with this part. Death of the adult does not relieve one of the responsibility for reporting the circumstances surrounding the death. However, unless the report indicates that there are other adults in the same or similar situation and that an investigation and provision of protective services are necessary to prevent their possible abuse, neglect or exploitation, it shall not be necessary for the department to make an investigation of the circumstances surrounding the death; provided, that the appropriate law-enforcement agency is notified.

If a hospital, clinic, school, or any other organization or agency responsible for the care of adults has a specific procedure, approved by the director of adult protective services for the department, or the director's designee, for the protection of adults who are victims of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, any member of its staff whose duty to report under this part arises from the performance of the staff member's services as a member of the staff of the organization may, at the staff member's option, fulfill that duty by reporting instead to the person in charge of the organization or the organization head's designee who shall make the report in accordance with this chapter.

An oral or written report shall be made immediately to the department upon knowledge of the occurrence of suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an adult. Any person making such a report shall provide the following information, if known: the name and address of the adult, or of any other person responsible for the adult's care; the age of the adult; the nature and extent of the abuse, neglect, or exploitation, including any evidence of previous abuse, neglect, or exploitation; the identity of the perpetrator, if known; the identity of the complainant, if possible; and any other information that the person believes might be helpful in establishing the cause of abuse, neglect, or exploitation. Each report of known or suspected abuse of an adult involving a sexual offense that is a violation of §§ 39-13-501 — 39-13-506 that occurs in a facility licensed by the department of mental health and substance abuse services as defined in § 33-2-402, or any hospital shall also be made to the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where such offense occurred.

Upon receipt of the report, the department shall take the following action as soon as practical:

Notify the appropriate law enforcement agency in all cases in which the report involves abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the adult by another person or persons;

Notify the appropriate licensing authority if the report concerns an adult who is a resident of, or at the time of any alleged harm is receiving services from, a facility that is required by law to be licensed or the person alleged to have caused or permitted the harm is licensed under title 63. The commissioner of health, upon becoming aware through personal knowledge, receipt of a report or otherwise, of confirmed exploitation, abuse, or neglect of a nursing home resident, shall report such instances to the Tennessee bureau of investigation for a determination by the bureau as to whether the circumstances reported constitute abuse of the medicaid program or other criminal violation;

Initiate an investigation of the complaint;

Make a written report of the initial findings together with a recommendation for further action, if indicated; and

After completing the evaluation, the department shall notify the person making the report of its determination.

Any representative of the department may enter any health facility or health service licensed by the state at any reasonable time to carry out its responsibilities under this part.

Any representative of the department may, with consent of the adult or caretaker, enter any private premises where any adult alleged to be abused, neglected, or exploited is found in order to investigate the need for protective services for the purpose of carrying out this part. If the adult or caretaker does not consent to the investigation, a search warrant may issue upon a showing of probable cause that an adult is being abused, neglected, or exploited, to enable a representative of the department to proceed with the investigation.

If a determination has been made that protective services are necessary when indicated by the investigation, the department shall provide such services within budgetary limitations, except in such cases where an adult chooses to refuse such services.

In the event the adult elects to accept the protective services to be provided by the department, the caretaker shall not interfere with the department when rendering such services.

If the adult does not consent to the receipt of protective services, or if the adult withdraws consent, the services shall be terminated, unless the department determines that the adult lacks capacity to consent, in which case it may seek court authorization to provide protective services.

Any representative of the department actively involved in the conduct of an abuse, neglect, or exploitation investigation under this part shall be allowed access to the mental and physical health records of the adult that are in the possession of any individual, hospital, or other facility if necessary to complete the investigation mandated by this chapter.

To complete the investigation required by this part, any authorized representative of the department actively involved in the conduct of an investigation pursuant to this part shall be allowed access to any law enforcement records or personnel records, not otherwise specifically protected by statute, of any person who is:

A caretaker of the adult; or

The alleged perpetrator of abuse, neglect or exploitation of the adult, who is the subject of the investigation.

If refused any information pursuant to subdivisions (j)(1) and (2), any information from any records necessary for conducting investigations pursuant to this part may be obtained upon motion by the department to the circuit, chancery or general sessions court of the county where such records are located, or in the court in which any proceeding concerning the adult may have been initiated or in the court in the county in which the investigation is being conducted.

The order on the department's motion may be entered ex parte upon a showing by the department of an immediate need for such information.

The court may enter such orders as may be necessary to ensure that the information sought is maintained pending any hearing on the motion, and to protect the information obtained from further disclosure if the information is made available to the department pursuant to the court's order.

The department may be allowed access to financial records that are contained in any financial institution, as defined by § 45-10-102(3):

Regarding:

The person who is the subject of the investigation;

Any caretaker of such person; and

Any alleged perpetrator of abuse, neglect or exploitation of such person;

By the issuance of an administrative subpoena in the name of the commissioner or an authorized representative of the commissioner that is:

Directed to the financial institution; and

Complies with §§ 45-10-106 and 45-10-107; or

By application, as otherwise required pursuant to § 45-10-117, to the circuit or chancery court in the county in which the financial institution is located, or in the court in which any proceeding concerning the adult may have been initiated or in which the investigation is being conducted, for the issuance of a judicial subpoena that complies with the requirements of § 45-10-107; provided, that the department shall not be required to post a bond pursuant to § 45-10-107(a)(4).

Nothing in this subdivision (j)(4) shall be construed to supersede the provision of financial records pursuant to the permissible acts allowed pursuant to § 45-10-103.

Any records received by the department, the confidentiality of which is protected by any other statute or regulation, shall be maintained as confidential pursuant to such statutes or regulations, except for such use as may be necessary in the conduct of any proceedings pursuant to its authority pursuant to this part or title 33 or 34.

If, as a result of its investigation, the department determines that an adult who is a resident or patient of a facility owned or operated by an administrative department of the state is in need of protective services, and the facility is unable or unwilling to take action to protect the resident or patient, the department shall make a report of its investigation, along with any recommendations for needed services to the commissioner of the department having responsibility for the facility. It shall then be the responsibility of the commissioner for that department and not the department of human services to take such steps as may be necessary to protect the adult from abuse, neglect, or exploitation and, in such cases, the affected administrative department of the state shall have standing to petition the court.

Notwithstanding subdivision (k)(1) or any other provision of this part to the contrary, the department of human services shall not be required to investigate and the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, or their successor agencies, shall not be required to report to the department of human services any allegations of abuse, neglect or exploitation involving any person that arise from conduct occurring in any institutions operated directly by either the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Allegations of abuse, neglect or exploitation of individuals occurring in the circumstances described in subdivision (k)(2)(A) shall be investigated, respectively, by investigators of the department of mental health and substance abuse services and the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, or their successor agencies, who have been assigned to investigate the allegations.

In the event the department, or a law enforcement agency, in the course of its investigation, is unable to determine to its satisfaction that sufficient information is available to determine whether an adult is in imminent danger or lacks the capacity to consent to protective services, an order may be issued, upon a showing of probable cause that an adult lacks capacity to consent to protective services and is being abused, neglected, or exploited, to require the adult to be examined by a physician, a psychologist in consultation with a physician or a psychiatrist in order that such determination can be made. An order for examination may be issued ex parte upon affidavit or sworn testimony if the court finds that there is cause to believe that the adult may be in imminent danger and that delay for a hearing would be likely to substantially increase the adult's likelihood of irreparable physical or mental harm, or both, and/or the cessation of life.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2603; Acts 1980, ch. 513, §§ 3-5, 8; 1986, ch. 630, §§ 5-8; T.C.A., §14-25-103; Acts 1993, ch. 439, § 3; 1995, ch. 486, §§ 2, 14; 1999, ch. 247, § 2; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 6, 8M; 2001, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 169, § 7; 2009, ch. 212, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 141, 142; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2015, ch. 387, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 169, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Nursing Home Compassion, Accountability, Respect and Enforcement Reform Act”.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Disclosure to law enforcement agencies of felonious acts of bodily harm or sexual offenses on premises of a facility or hospital whose records are confidential, §33-3-104.

Provision of protective services without consent of the adult, §71-6-107.

Right of elderly person or disabled adult to recover for abuse or neglect, sexual abuse or exploitation, or theft, §71-6-120.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of regulations issued by the comptroller of the currency, OAG 04-057, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (4/06/04).

71-6-104. Remedies — Injunctive relief.

Any court with jurisdiction under this part may upon proper application by the department issue a temporary restraining order or other injunctive relief to prohibit any violation of this part, regardless of the existence of any other remedy at law.

The court may enjoin from providing care for any person, on a temporary or permanent basis, any employee or volunteer, who the court finds has engaged in the abuse, neglect or exploitation of an adult as defined in this part, in any situation involving the care of such adult by such employee or volunteer, whether such actions occurred in an institutional setting, in any type of group home or foster care arrangement serving adults, and regardless of whether such person, facility or arrangement serving adults is licensed to provide care for adults.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2604; Acts 1986, ch. 630, § 18; T.C.A., §14-25-104; Acts 1995, ch. 486, § 8.

71-6-105. Reporting or investigating parties — Immunity from liability — Protection from job discrimination.

Any person making any report or investigation pursuant to this part, including representatives of the department in the reasonable performance of their duties and within the scope of their authority, shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and shall thereby be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from such report or investigation. Any person making a report under this part shall have a civil cause of action for appropriate compensatory and punitive damages against any person who causes a detrimental change in the employment status of the reporting party by reason of the report.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-2605; Acts 1980, ch. 513, § 6; T.C.A., §14-25-105.

71-6-106. Privilege for confidential communications.

Notwithstanding the existence of the privilege for confidential communications between husband and wife, the chancellor at the hearing may compel testimony if, in the chancellor's opinion, disclosure is necessary in the interest of the adult.

Acts 1978, ch. 899, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-2606, 14-25-106.

Law Reviews.

Should Tennessee Bury the Dead Man Statute As Arkansas Has? (W. Dent. Gitchel), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 195 (1989).